Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202660-1466
Warranty compensation claim; requirements.

(1) A dealer shall submit a warranty compensation claim within forty-five days after completing consumer care relating to the compensation claim. Such claim shall be in the manner and form prescribed by the warrantor.

(2) A request by a dealer for payment of warranty compensation shall not be denied except for cause, including performance of nonwarranty repairs, material noncompliance with the warrantor's published policies and procedures, lack of material documentation, fraud, and misrepresentation.

(3) A warrantor shall provide written notice to the dealer for any warranty claim that the warrantor denies. Such written notice shall be provided to the headquarters of the dealer within forty-five days after the date of submission for payment of warranty compensation by the dealer.

(4) Any claim that is not denied pursuant to subsection (3) of this section shall be deemed to be approved and shall be paid within sixty days after the date of submission for payment of warranty compensation by the dealer.

Laws 2026, LB972, § 25.
October 1, 2026